Utah statutes.
53B-21-106.   Examination and certification of bonds by attorney general --
Recital of certification -- Incontestability of bonds.
(1)  The resolutions and proceedings authorizing the issuance and confirming
sale of bonds under this chapter are submitted to the attorney general for
examination.
(2)  When the resolutions and proceedings have been examined and the bonds
certified as legal obligations by the attorney general, the bonds are
incontestable in any court in the state unless suit is brought within 30 days
from the date of the approval.
(3)  A bond authorized under this section shall contain a recital on its face
in substantially the following form: "This bond is one of a series of bonds
which were certified as legal obligations by the attorney general of the state
of Utah on ___."
(4)  Bonds authorized, issued, and sold under resolutions and proceedings
approved by the attorney general are prima facie valid and binding obligations
according to their terms.
(5)  The only defense which may be offered in any suit instituted after the
30-day period has expired is forgery, fraud, or violation of the Constitution.
